Utah statutes.
10-3-1007.   Examinations.
All applicants for employment in the classified civil service shall be subject
to examination, which shall be public, competitive and free. Examinations
shall be held at such times and places as the civil service commission shall
from time to time determine, and shall be for the purpose of determining the
qualifications of applicants for positions. Examinations shall be practical
and shall fairly test the fitness in every respect of the persons examined to
discharge the duties of the positions to which they seek to be appointed, and
shall include tests of physical qualifications and health.
